Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.090

Status of existing employees in classified service.

For the benefit of the public service and to prevent delay, injury, or interruption therein by reason of the enactment hereof, all persons holding a position which is deemed classified by RCW 41.14.070 for a continuous period of six months prior to December 4, 1958, are eligible for permanent appointment under civil service to the offices, places, positions, or employments which they then held without examination or other act on their part, and not on probation; and every such person is automatically adopted and inducted permanently into civil service, into the office, place, position, or employment which he or she then held as completely and effectually to all intents and purposes as if such person had been permanently appointed thereto under civil service after examination and investigation.

[ 2012 c 117 s 13; 1959 c 1 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]